Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8156. PASEO DEL ESTE MUNICIPAL UTILITY

DISTRICT NO. 11 OF EL PASO COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8156.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means Paseo del Este Municipal Utility District No. 11 of El Paso County.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 21.070, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 8156.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district in El Paso County created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 8156.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(c) The creation of the district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 8156.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 3, Chapter 700, Acts of the 74th Legislature, Regular Session, 1995, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter H, Chapter 54, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

(b) The boundaries and field notes of the district form a closure. A mistake in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect:

(1) the district's organization, existence, or validity;

(2) the district's right to impose a tax; or

(3) the legality or operation of the district or its governing body.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 8156.005. EFFECT OF CHAPTER ON CITY OF EL PASO. This chapter does not diminish or affect the City of El Paso's extraterritorial jurisdiction or its rights under the Local Government Code.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8156.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The district is governed by a board of five directors.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8156.101. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by general law applicable to a municipal utility district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49, 50, and 54, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 8156.102. ANNEXATION OF DISTRICT TERRITORY BY POLITICAL SUBDIVISION. A political subdivision that annexes the district territory included in Section 3, Chapter 700, Acts of the 74th Legislature, Regular Session, 1995, as provided by Chapter 43, Local Government Code, assumes the district's powers, functions, and duties and any outstanding bonded indebtedness of the district.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 8156.103. AUTHORITY OF EL PASO WATER UTILITIES PUBLIC SERVICE BOARD OVER DISTRICT FACILITIES. (a) In this section, "Public Service Board" means the El Paso Water Utilities Public Service Board.

(b) The plans and specifications for any facilities to be constructed or acquired by the district must be approved by the Public Service Board. The Public Service Board may not unreasonably withhold or delay the approval.

(c) The Public Service Board is entitled to inspect or act as the construction manager for district facilities to ensure that the facilities meet the applicable standards of the Public Service Board. The district shall pay the Public Service Board a reasonable fee for those services consistent with fees charged for similar services the Public Service Board provides on similar utility construction contracts.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.